California statutes. Penal Code
(b) The name, telephone number, address, or other identifying information of the owner or lessee of property used for a commercial activity or event.

(c) The name, telephone number, address, or other identifying information of the sponsor or promoter of a sporting event, concert, theatrical performance, or similar activity or event.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 192, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Trespass on Property Belonging to the University of California [558. - 558.1.]

558.

Every person other than an officer, employee or student of the University of California, or licensee of the Regents of the University of California, is forbidden to enter upon those lands bordering on the Pacific Ocean in San Diego County, which were granted by Section 1 of Chapter 514 of the Statutes of 1929 to the Regents of the University of California for the uses and purposes of the University of California in connection with scientific research and investigation at the Scripps Institution of Oceanography, or upon state waters adjacent thereto, or to trespass upon the same, or to interfere with the exclusive possession, occupation, and use thereof by the Regents of the University of California.

Nothing herein contained shall be deemed or construed to affect in any manner the rights of navigation and fishery reserved to the people by the Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

558.1.

Every person who violates any of the provisions of Section 558 is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than six hundred dollars ($600) or by imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 304.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.5. Crimes Involving Bailments [560. - 560.6.]

560.

Any bailee, as defined in Section 7102 of the Uniform Commercial Code, who issues or aids in issuing a document of title, or any person who secures the issue by a bailee of a document of title, or any person who negotiates or transfers for value a document of title knowing that the goods for which that document is issued have not been actually received by that bailee or are not under his or her control at the time of issuing that receipt shall be guilty of a crime and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 394.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

560.1.

Any bailee, as defined in Section 7102 of the Uniform Commercial Code, who fraudulently issues or aids in fraudulently issuing a receipt for goods knowing that it contains any false statement shall be guilty of a crime and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding one year or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

560.2.

Any bailee, as defined in Section 7102 of the Uniform Commercial Code, who delivers goods out of the possession of such bailee knowing that a negotiable document of title the negotiation of which would transfer the right to the possession of such goods is outstanding and uncanceled without obtaining possession of such document at or before the time for such delivery shall, except for the cases in Sections 7210, 7308, 7601 and 7602 of the Uniform Commercial Code, be guilty of a crime and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding one year or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

560.3.

Any person who deposits goods with a bailee, as defined in Section 7102 of the Uniform Commercial Code, to which he has not title or upon which there is a security interest and who takes for such goods a negotiable document of title which he afterwards negotiates for value with intent to deceive and without disclosing his want of title or the existence of the security interest shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction shall be punished for such offense by imprisonment not exceeding one year or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

560.4.

Any bailee, as defined in Section 7102 of the Uniform Commercial Code, who issues or aids in issuing a duplicate or additional negotiable document of title for goods knowing that a former negotiable document of title for the same goods or any part of them is outstanding and uncanceled without plainly placing upon the face thereof the word “duplicate,” except in cases of bills in a set and documents issued as substitutes for lost, stolen or destroyed documents, shall be guilty of a crime and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 395.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

560.5.

Where there are deposited with or held by a warehouseman goods of which he is owner either solely or jointly or in common with others such warehouseman or any of his officers, agents, or servants who knowing of this ownership issues or aids in issuing a negotiable document of title for such goods which does not state such ownership, shall be guilty of a crime and upon conviction shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding one year or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

560.6.

(1) A corporation, firm, or person, and its or his agents or employees shall not issue, sell, pledge, assign, or transfer in this State any receipt, certificate, or other written instrument purporting to be a warehouse receipt, or in the similitude of a warehouse receipt, or designed to be understood as a warehouse receipt, for goods, wares, or merchandise stored or deposited, or claimed to be stored or deposited, in any warehouse, public or private, in any other state, unless such receipt, certificate, or other written instrument has been issued by the warehouseman operating such warehouse.

(2) A corporation, firm, or person, and its or his agents or employees shall not issue, sell, pledge, assign, or transfer in this State any receipt, certificate, or other written instrument for goods, wares, or merchandise claimed to be stored or deposited, in any warehouse, public or private, in any other state, knowing that there is no such warehouse located at the place named in such receipt, certificate, or other written instrument, or if there is a warehouse at such place knowing that there are no goods, wares, or merchandise stored or deposited therein as specified in such receipt, certificate, or other written instrument.

(3) A corporation, firm, or person, and its or his agents or employees shall not issue, sign, sell, pledge, assign, or transfer in this State any receipt, certificate, or other written instrument evidencing, or purporting to evidence, the creation of a security interest in, or sale, or bailment, of any goods, wares, or merchandise stored or deposited, or claimed to be stored or deposited, in any warehouse, public or private, in any other state, unless such receipt, certificate, or other written instrument plainly designates the number and location of such warehouse and contains a full, true, and complete copy of the receipt issued by the warehouseman operating the warehouse in which such goods, wares, or merchandise is stored or deposited, or is claimed to be stored or deposited. This section shall not apply to the issue, signing, sale, pledge, assignment, or transfer of bona fide warehouse receipts issued by the warehouseman operating public or bonded warehouses in other states according to the laws of the state in which such warehouses are located.

(4) Every corporation, firm, person, agent, or employee, who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and may in addition be imprisoned in the county jail for not exceeding six months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.6. Crimes Involving Branded Containers, Cabinets, or Other Dairy Equipment [565. - 566.]

565.

It is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or both, for an unauthorized person to possess or use, or to obliterate or destroy the brand registration upon, containers (including milk cases), cabinets, or other dairy equipment, which have a value of nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) or less, when the containers, cabinets, or other dairy equipment are marked with a brand that is registered pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 34501) of Part 1 of Division 15 of the Food and Agricultural Code. “Unauthorized person” shall
 have the meaning of that term as defined in Section 34564 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 28, Sec. 31.   (SB 18 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

566.

It is a felony, punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or both, for an unauthorized person to possess or use, or to obliterate or destroy the brand registration upon, containers (including milk cases), cabinets, or other dairy equipment, which have a value in excess of nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), when the containers, cabinets, or other dairy equipment are marked with a brand that is registered pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 34501) of Part 1 of Division 15 of the Food and Agricultural Code. “Unauthorized person” shall have the meaning of that term as defined in Section 34564 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 396.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.7. Unlawful Subleasing of Motor Vehicles [570. - 574.]

570.

An act of unlawful subleasing of a motor vehicle, as defined in Section 571, shall be punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 397.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

571.

(a) A person engages in an act of unlawful subleasing of a motor vehicle if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The motor vehicle is subject to a lease contract, conditional sale contract, or security agreement the terms of which prohibit the transfer or assignment of any right or interest in the motor vehicle or under the lease contract, conditional sale contract, or security agreement.

(2) The person is not a party to the lease contract, conditional sale contract, or security agreement.

(3) The person transfers or assigns, or purports to transfer or assign, any right or interest in the motor vehicle or under the lease contract, conditional sale contract, or security agreement, to any person who is not a party to the lease contract, conditional sale contract, or security agreement.

(4) The person does not obtain, prior to the transfer or assignment described in paragraph (3), written consent to the transfer or assignment from the motor vehicle’s lessor, seller, or secured party.

(5) The person receives compensation or some other consideration for the transfer or assignment described in paragraph (3).

(b) A person engages in an act of unlawful subleasing of a motor vehicle when the person is not a party to the lease contract, conditional sale contract, or security agreement, and assists, causes, or arranges an actual or purported transfer or assignment, as described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1072, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

572.

(a) The actual or purported transfer or assignment, or the assisting, causing, or arranging of an actual or purported transfer or assignment, of any right or interest in a motor vehicle or under a lease contract, conditional sale contract, or security agreement, by an individual who is a party to the lease contract, conditional sale contract, or security agreement is not an act of unlawful subleasing of a motor vehicle and is not subject to prosecution.

(b) This chapter shall not affect the enforceability of any provision of any lease contract, conditional sale contract, security agreement, or direct loan agreement by any party thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1072, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

573.

(a) The penalties under this chapter are in addition to any other remedies or penalties provided by law for the conduct proscribed by this chapter.

(b) If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional, the remainder of the chapter and the application of its provisions to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1072, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

574.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Buyer” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 2981 of the Civil Code.

(b) “Conditional sale contract” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 2981 of the Civil Code. Notwithstanding subdivision (k) of Section 2981 of the Civil Code, “conditional sale contract” includes any contract for the sale or bailment of a motor vehicle between a buyer and a seller primarily for business or commercial purposes.

(c) “Direct loan agreement” means an agreement between a lender and a
 purchaser whereby the lender has advanced funds pursuant to a loan secured by the motor vehicle which the purchaser has purchased.

(d) “Lease contract” means a lease contract between a lessor and lessee as this term and these parties are defined in Section 2985.7 of the Civil Code. Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 2985.7 of the Civil Code, “lease contract” includes a lease for business or commercial purposes.

(e) “Motor vehicle” means any vehicle required to be registered under the Vehicle Code.

(f) “Person” means an individual, company, firm, association, partnership, trust, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity.

(g) “Purchaser” has the meaning set forth in paragraph (30) of subdivision (b) of Section 1201 of the
 Commercial Code.

(h) “Security agreement” and “secured party” have the meanings set forth, respectively, in paragraphs (74) and (73) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code. “Security interest” has the meaning set forth in paragraph (35) of subdivision (b) of Section 1201 of the Commercial Code.

(i) “Seller” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 2981 of the Civil Code, and includes the present holder of the conditional sale contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 27.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Fraudulent Issue of Documents of Title to Merchandise [577. - 583.]

577.

Every person, being the master, owner or agent of any vessel, or officer or agent of any railroad, express or transportation company, or otherwise being or representing any carrier, who delivers any bill of lading, receipt or other voucher, by which it appears that any merchandise of any description has been shipped on board any vessel, or delivered to any railroad, express or transportation company or other carrier, unless the same has been so shipped or delivered, and is at the time actually under the control of such carrier or the master, owner or agent of such vessel, or of some officer or agent of that company, to be forwarded as expressed in that bill of lading, receipt or voucher, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a
 fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 398.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

578.

Every person carrying on the business of a warehouseman, wharfinger, or other depositary of property, who issues any receipt, bill of lading, or other voucher for any merchandise of any description, which has not been actually received upon the premises of that person, and is not under his or her actual control at the time of issuing such instrument, whether that instrument is issued to a person as being the owner of that merchandise or as security for any indebtedness, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 399.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

579.

No person shall be convicted of an offense under Section 577 or 578 by reason that the contents of any barrel, box, case, cask, or other vessel or package mentioned in the bill of lading, receipt, or other voucher did not correspond with the description given in the instrument of the merchandise received, if the description corresponded substantially with the marks, labels, or brands upon the outside of the vessel or package, unless it appears that the accused knew that the marks, labels, or brands were untrue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

580.

Every person mentioned in this chapter, who issues any second or duplicate receipt or voucher, of a kind specified therein, at a time while any former receipt or voucher for the merchandise specified in that second receipt is outstanding and uncanceled, without writing across the face of the same the word “Duplicate,” in a plain and legible manner, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 400.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

581.

Every person mentioned in this chapter, who sells, hypothecates, or pledges any merchandise for which any bill of lading, receipt, or voucher has been issued by him or her, without the consent in writing thereto of the person holding that bill, receipt, or voucher, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 401.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

583.

Section 581 does not apply where property is demanded or sold by virtue of process of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 34.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Malicious Injuries to Railroad Bridges, Highways, Bridges, and Telegraphs [587. - 593g.]

587.

Every person who maliciously does either of the following is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year:

 (a) Removes, displaces, injures, or destroys any part of any railroad, whether for steam or horse cars, or any track of any railroad, or any branch or branchway, switch, turnout, bridge, viaduct, culvert, embankment, station house, or other structure or fixture, or any part thereof, attached to or connected with any railroad.

(b) Places any obstruction upon the rails or track of any railroad, or of any switch, branch, branchway, or turnout connected with
 any railroad.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 402.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

587.1.

(a) Every person who maliciously moves or causes to be moved, without authorization, any locomotive, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year.

(b) Every person who maliciously moves or causes to be moved, without authorization, any locomotive, when the moving creates a substantial likelihood of causing personal injury or death to another, is guilty of a public offense punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 403.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

587a.

Every person, who, without being thereunto duly authorized by the owner, lessee, or person or corporation engaged in the operation of any railroad, shall manipulate or in anywise tamper or interfere with any air brake or other device, appliance or apparatus in or upon any car or locomotive upon such railroad, and used or provided for use in the operation of such car or locomotive, or of any train upon such railroad, or with any switch, signal or other appliance or apparatus used or provided for use in the operation of such railroad, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1909, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

587b.

Every person, who shall, without being thereunto authorized by the owner, lessee, person or corporation operating any railroad, enter into, climb upon, hold to, or in any manner attach himself to any locomotive, locomotive-engine tender, freight or passenger car upon such railroad, or any portion of any train thereon, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50), or by imprisonment not exceeding 30 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 137.)
-------------------------------------------

587c.

Every person who fraudulently evades, or attempts to evade the payment of his fare, while traveling upon any railroad, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars, or imprisonment not exceeding six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1909, Ch. 345.)
-------------------------------------------

588.

Every person who negligently, willfully or maliciously digs up, removes, displaces, breaks down or otherwise injures or destroys any state or other public highway or bridge, or any private way, laid out by authority of law, or bridge upon any such highway or private way, or who negligently, willfully or maliciously sprinkles, drains, diverts or in any manner permits water from any sprinkler, ditch, canal, flume, or reservoir to flow upon or saturate by seepage any public highway, which act tends to damage such highway or tends to be a hazard to traffic thereon, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. This section shall not apply to the natural flow of surface or flood waters that are not diverted, accelerated or concentrated by such person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1625.)
-------------------------------------------

588a.

Any person who throws or deposits any oil, glass bottle, glass, nails, tacks, hoops, wire, cans, or any other substance likely to injure any person, animal or vehicle upon any public highway in the State of California shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; provided, however, that any person who willfully deposits any such substance upon any public highway in the State of California with the intent to cause great bodily injury to other persons using the highway shall be guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 250.)
-------------------------------------------

588b.

Any person who wilfully breaks down, removes, injures, or destroys any barrier or obstruction erected or placed in or upon any road or highway by the authorities in charge thereof, or by any authorized contractor engaged in the construction or maintenance thereof, or who tears down, defaces, removes, or destroys any warnings, notices, or directional signs erected, placed or posted in, upon, or adjacent to any road or highway, or who extinguishes, removes, injures, or destroys any warning light or lantern, or reflectorized warning or directional sign, erected, placed or maintained by any such authority in, upon or adjacent to any such road or highway, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1933, Ch. 403.)
-------------------------------------------

590.

Every person who maliciously removes, destroys, injures, breaks or defaces any mile post, board or stone, or guide post erected on or near any highway, or any inscription thereon, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1907, Ch. 489.)
-------------------------------------------

590a.

One-half of all fines imposed and collected under Section 590 shall be paid to the informer who first causes a complaint to be filed charging the defendant with the violation of Section 590.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

591.

A person who unlawfully and maliciously takes down, removes, injures, disconnects, cuts, or obstructs a line of telegraph, telephone, or cable television, or any line used to conduct electricity, or any part thereof, or appurtenances or apparatus connected therewith, including, but not limited to, a backup deep cycle battery or other power supply, or severs any wire thereof, or makes an unauthorized connection with any line, other than a telegraph, telephone, or cable television line, used to conduct electricity, or any part thereof, or appurtenances or apparatus connected therewith, is subject to punishment
 by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine, or by imprisonment in a county jail for 16 months, two or three years pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 and a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.   (AB 1782)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

591.5.

A person who unlawfully and maliciously removes, injures, destroys, damages, or obstructs the use of any wireless communication device with the intent to prevent the use of the device to summon assistance or notify law enforcement or any public safety agency of a crime is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 695, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

592.

(a) Every person who shall, without authority of the owner or managing agent, and with intent to defraud, take water from any canal, ditch, flume, or reservoir used for the purpose of holding or conveying water for manufacturing, agricultural, mining, irrigating, generation of power, or domestic uses is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) If the total retail value of all the water taken is more than nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), or if the defendant has previously been convicted of an offense under this section or any former section that would be an offense under this section, or of an
 offense under the laws of another state or of the United States that would have been an offense under this section if committed in this state, then the violation is punishable by imprisonment in
 a county jail for not more than one year, or in the state prison.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 28, Sec. 33.   (SB 18 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

593.

Every person who unlawfully and maliciously takes down, removes, injures, interferes with, or obstructs any line erected or maintained by proper authority for the purpose of transmitting electricity for light, heat, or power, or any part thereof, or any insulator or crossarm, appurtenance or apparatus connected therewith, or severs or in any way interferes with any wire, cable, or current thereof, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 405.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

593a.

(a) Every person who maliciously drives or places, in any tree, saw-log, shingle-bolt, or other wood, any iron, steel, ceramic, or other substance sufficiently hard to injure saws, knowing that the tree is intended to be harvested or that the saw-log, shingle-bolt, or other wood is intended to be manufactured into any kind of lumber or other wood product, is guilty of a felony.

(b) Any person who violates subdivision (a) and causes bodily injury to another person other than an accomplice shall, in addition and consecutive to the punishment prescribed for that felony, be punished by an additional prison term of three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1132, Sec. 1.   Effective September 25, 1987.   Operative September 30, 1987, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 1132.)
-------------------------------------------

593b.

Every person who shall, without the written permission of the owner, lessee, or person or corporation operating any electrical transmission line, distributing line or system, climb upon any pole, tower or other structure which is a part of such line or system and is supporting or is designed to support a wire or wires, cable or cables, for the transmission or distribution of electric energy, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor; provided, that nothing herein shall apply to employees of either privately or publicly owned public utilities engaged in the performance of their duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

593c.

Every person who willfully and maliciously breaks, digs up, obstructs, interferes with, removes or injures any pipe or main or hazardous liquid pipeline erected, operated, or maintained for the purpose of transporting, conveying or distributing gas or other hazardous liquids for light, heat, power or any other purpose, or any part thereof, or any valve, meter, holder, compressor, machinery, appurtenance, equipment or apparatus connected with any such main or pipeline, or used in connection with or affecting the operation thereof or the conveying of gas or hazardous liquid therethrough, or shuts off, removes, obstructs, injures, or in any way interferes with any valve or fitting installed on, connected to, or operated in connection with any such main or pipeline, or controlling or affecting the flow of gas or hazardous liquid through any such main or pipeline, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

593d.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (e), any person who, for the purpose of intercepting, receiving, or using any program or other service carried by a multichannel video or information services provider that the person is not authorized by that provider to receive or use, commits any of the following acts is guilty of a public offense:

(1) Knowingly and willfully makes or maintains an unauthorized connection or connections, whether physically, electrically, electronically, or inductively, to any cable, wire, or other component of a multichannel video or information services provider’s system or to a cable, wire or other media, or receiver that is attached to a multichannel video or information services provider’s system.

(2) Knowingly and willfully purchases, possesses, attaches, causes to be attached, assists others in attaching, or maintains the attachment of any unauthorized device or devices to any cable, wire, or other component of a multichannel video or information services provider’s system or to a cable, wire or other media, or receiver that is attached to a multichannel video or information services provider’s system.

(3) Knowingly and willfully makes or maintains any modification or alteration to any device installed with the authorization of a multichannel video or information services provider.

(4) Knowingly and willfully makes or maintains any modifications or alterations to an access device that authorizes services or knowingly and willfully obtains an unauthorized access device and uses the modified, altered, or unauthorized access device to obtain services from a multichannel video or information services provider.

For purposes of this section, each purchase, possession, connection, attachment, or modification shall constitute a separate violation of this section.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (e), any person who knowingly and willfully manufactures, assembles, modifies, imports into this state, distributes, sells, offers to sell, advertises for sale, or possesses for any of these purposes, any device or kit for a device, designed, in whole or in part, to decrypt, decode, descramble, or otherwise make intelligible any encrypted, encoded, scrambled, or other nonstandard signal carried by a multichannel video or information services provider, unless the device has been granted an equipment authorization by the Federal Communications Commission (FCC), is guilty of a public offense.

For purposes of this subdivision, “encrypted, encoded, scrambled, or other nonstandard signal” means any type of signal or transmission that is not intended to produce an intelligible program or service without the use of a special device, signal, or information provided by the multichannel video or information services provider or its agents to authorized subscribers.

(c) Every person who knowingly and willfully makes or maintains an unauthorized connection or connections with, whether physically, electrically, electronically, or inductively, or who attaches, causes to be attached, assists others in attaching, or maintains any attachment to, any cable, wire, or other component of a multichannel video or information services provider’s system, for the purpose of interfering with, altering, or degrading any multichannel video or information service being transmitted to others, or for the purpose of transmitting or broadcasting any program or other service not intended to be transmitted or broadcast by the multichannel video or information services provider, is guilty of a public offense.

For purposes of this section, each transmission or broadcast shall constitute a separate violation of this section.

(d) (1) Any person who violates subdivision (a) shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding 90 days, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) Any person who violates subdivision (b) shall be punished as follows:

(A) If the violation involves the manufacture, assembly, modification, importation into this state, distribution, advertisement for sale, or possession for sale or for any of these purposes, of 10 or more of the items described in subdivision (b), or the sale or offering for sale of five or more items for financial gain, the person shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or in the state prison, by a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(B) If the violation involves the manufacture, assembly, modification, importation into this state, distribution, advertisement for sale, or possession for sale or for any of these purposes, of nine or less of the items described in subdivision (b), or the sale or offering for sale of four or less items for financial gain, shall upon a conviction of a first offense, be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, by a fine not exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. A second or subsequent conviction shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or in the state prison, by a fine not exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(3) Any person who violates subdivision (c) shall be punished by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment in a county jail, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(e) Any device or kit described in subdivision (a) or (b) seized under warrant or incident to a lawful arrest, upon the conviction of a person for a violation of subdivision (a) or (b), may be destroyed as contraband by the sheriff.

(f) Any person who violates this section shall be liable in a civil action to the multichannel video or information services provider for the greater of the following amounts:

(1) Five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(2) Three times the amount of actual damages, if any, sustained by the plaintiff plus reasonable attorney’s fees.

A defendant who prevails in the action shall be awarded his or her reasonable attorney’s fees.

(g) Any multichannel video or information services provider may, in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, bring an action to enjoin and restrain any violation of this section, and may in the same action seek damages as provided in subdivision (f).

(h) It is not a necessary prerequisite to an action pursuant to this section that the plaintiff has suffered, or be threatened with, actual damages.
